Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Article 3. Explosives.

§ 45-13-101.
Seller to keep records; when sale of explosives unlawful.

Every person who sells or otherwise disposes of dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives, shall keep an accurate record of the name of the purchaser, his address, quantity, and the general purpose of its intended use. It shall be unlawful to sell dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives unless the person making the sale knows the purchaser and the general purpose for which such explosive or its counterpart will be used.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-31; Laws, 1964, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after 30 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 45-13-103.
Sales of explosives to be reported; regulation by municipalities.

Every seller of dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives shall report any sale, transfer of title, or removal to the sheriff of the county where such transfer or removal took place within twenty-four (24) hours on forms to be provided. Should the sale, transfer of title of removal of explosives be within a municipality, then a report shall also be made within twenty-four (24) hours to the chief of police on forms to be provided. The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to adopt ordinances for the further regulation and control of dynamite, nitroglycerine and similar explosives.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-32; Laws, 1964, ch. 337, § 2, eff from and after 30 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 45-13-105.
Penalties for failure to report sale of explosives.

Any seller of dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators, or other similar explosives who does not report to proper authorities as required by this article shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary not exceeding five (5) years, or in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-33; Laws, 1964, ch. 337, § 3, eff from and after 30 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 45-13-107.
Safekeeping of explosives.

Any person who has dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives in his possession and being engaged in a lawful business which ordinarily requires the use thereof in the ordinary and usual conduct of such business, and who possesses said articles for the purpose of use in said business, or any seller, dealer, or person transporting said articles, shall keep said articles under his control and secure from theft or pilferage at all times.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-34; Laws, 1964, ch. 337, § 4, eff from and after 30 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 45-13-109.
Reports of importation of explosives; fees; penalties.

Every person transporting or bringing dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives into the State of Mississippi shall immediately report to the sheriff of the county of original entry, identify himself, give his destination and an inventory which shall be filed in a register to be kept by the sheriff. The sheriff shall, within twenty-four (24) hours, after receiving the name, destination and inventory, report same to the commissioner of public safety. For such registering and reporting, the sheriff shall be paid a fee of Three Dollars ($3.00) by the person transporting the explosives. A person transporting dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas bombs, dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators or other similar explosives who fails to report his name, destination and inventory shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary not exceeding twenty (20) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-35; Laws, 1964, ch. 337, § 5, eff from and after 30 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).